Washington statutes.
RCW 5.52.050

Electronic copies as evidence.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any instrument in writing, duly certified, under his or her hand and official seal, by a notary public, commissioner of deeds, or clerk of a court of record, to be genuine, within the personal knowledge of such officer, may, together with such certificate, be sent by telegraph or other electronic transmission and the telegraphic or other electronic transmission copy thereof shall, prima facie, only have the same force, effect and validity, in all respects whatsoever as the original, and the burden of proof shall rest with the party denying the genuineness, or due execution of the original.

[ 2006 c 198 s 2; Code 1881 s 2356; 1865 p 75 s 15; RRS s 11349.]